Maryland, session 2026, HB0694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:, on or before December 1, 2026, the Office of
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0694*

HOUSE BILL 694
the Comptroller shall study and report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257
of the State Government Article, the General Assembly regarding:
(1) the number of residents who have foreign earned income within the
meaning of § 911(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(2) the number of residents who have foreign earned income that exceeds
the limitation under § 911(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code and the aggregate amount of
that income; and
(3) the countries from which the residents described under items (1) and
(2) of this section earned foreign earned income within the meaning of § 911(b) of the
Internal Revenue Code.
Article – Tax – General
10–204.
(a) To the extent excluded from federal adjusted gross income, the amounts under
this section are added to the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to determine
Maryland adjusted gross income.
(c) (1) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO FOREIGN EARNED
INCOME WITHIN THE MEANING OF § 911(B)(1) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE,
SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATION UNDER § 911(B)(2) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE
CODE.
(II) If exempted by federal law or by treaty from federal but not State
tax on income, the addition under subsection (a) of this section includes salary, wages, or
other compensation for personal services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.